Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-51-101. Creation of corporation.

There is hereby created a corporation, which shall be known as the “Tennessee education lottery corporation.”

The corporation shall be registered with the secretary of state and shall be subject to the corporate laws of the state.

The corporation shall be a body, politic and corporate, and a quasi-public instrumentality, and not a state agency or department, which shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state through the operation of a state lottery and in the performance of other essential public functions entrusted to it.

The corporation shall have perpetual succession and shall adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws and regulations for the conduct of its affairs.

The corporation shall strive to maximize net lottery proceeds.

Venue for the corporation is Davidson County.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 1 provided that:

“This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Tennessee Education Lottery Implementation Law’.”

Cross-References. Law enforcement efforts, §39-15-413.

Lotteries, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 5.

Lotteries, chain letters and pyramid clubs, §39-17-506.

Lottery not gambling, §8-47-127.

Lottery sales, title 39, ch. 17, part 6.

Possession of gambling device or record, forfeiture, §39-17-505.

State lottery proceeds, title 49, ch. 4, part 9.

Tennessee education lottery corporation, §§4-51-132,4-51-133.

Tennessee Lottery Funds for Education Projects Loan Act of 2003, title 4, ch. 31, part 10.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 18 Tenn. Juris., Lotteries, §§ 1 et seq.

Law Reviews.

Let the Games Begin: Examining the Lottery (John P. Williams), 39 No. 11 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2003).

So Your Client Just Won the Lottery. ( Dan W. Holbrook), 40 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 32 (2004).

Attorney General Opinions. Legality of lottery pool, OAG 04-042, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (3/12/04).

4-51-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of directors of the Tennessee education lottery corporation;

“Chief executive officer” means the chief executive officer of the Tennessee education lottery corporation;

“Corporation” means the Tennessee education lottery corporation;

“Director” means a member of the board of directors of the Tennessee education lottery corporation;

“Educational programs and purposes” means financial assistance to Tennessee citizens to enable such citizens to attend post-secondary educational institutions located within Tennessee, capital outlay projects for grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12) educational facilities, early learning programs and after school programs in accordance with article XI, § 5 of the Constitution of Tennessee;

“Immediate family” means a spouse, child, step-child, brother, sister, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, parent, or grandparent;

“Local government unit” means any county, metropolitan government, incorporated town or city, or special district of the state;

“Lottery,” “lotteries,” “lottery game,” or “lottery games” means any game of chance approved by the board and operated pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, instant tickets, on-line games, and games using mechanical or electronic devices. For the purposes of this chapter, “lottery,” “lotteries,” “lottery game,” or “lottery games” does not include:

Casino gambling or games of chance associated with casinos and prohibited pursuant to the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5. For the purposes of this subdivision (8)(A), “casino gambling” means a location or business for the purpose of conducting illegal gambling activities, excluding the sale and purchase of lottery tickets or shares as authorized by this chapter; or

Video lottery. For the purposes of this subdivision (8)(B), “video lottery” means a lottery that allows a game to be played utilizing an electronic computer and an interactive terminal device, equipped with a video screen and keys, a keyboard or other equipment allowing input by an individual player, into which the player inserts coins or currency as consideration in order for play to be available, and through which terminal device, the player may receive free games or a voucher that can be redeemed for a cash or noncash prize, or nothing, determined wholly or predominantly by chance;

“Lottery proceeds” or “proceeds” means all lottery revenue derived from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and all other moneys derived from the lottery or received by the Tennessee education lottery corporation;

“Lottery retailer” or “retailer” means a person who sells lottery tickets or shares on behalf of the Tennessee education lottery corporation pursuant to a contract;

“Lottery vendor” or “vendor” means a person who provides or proposes to provide goods or services to the Tennessee education lottery corporation pursuant to a major procurement contract, but does not include an employee of the Tennessee education lottery corporation, a retailer, or a state agency or instrumentality of the Tennessee education lottery corporation. Such term does include a corporation whose shares are traded publicly and that is the parent company of the contracting party in a major procurement contract;

“Major procurement contract” means any gaming product or service costing in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), including, but not limited to, major advertising contracts, annuity contracts, prize payment agreements, consulting services, equipment, tickets, and other products and services unique to the Tennessee lottery, but not including materials, supplies, equipment, and services common to the ordinary operations of a corporation;

“Minority-owned business” means a business that is solely owned, or at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the assets or outstanding stock of which is owned, by an individual who personally manages and controls the daily operations of such business and who is impeded from normal entry into the economic mainstream because of:

Past practices of discrimination based on race, religion, ethnic background, or sex;

A disability as defined in § 4-26-102; or

Past practices of racial discrimination against African-Americans;

“Net proceeds” or “net lottery proceeds” means all revenue derived from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and all other moneys derived from lottery games minus operating expenses. “Net proceeds” or “net lottery proceeds” does not include unclaimed prize money;

“Operating expense” means all costs of doing business including, but not limited to, prizes, commissions, and other compensation paid to a lottery retailer, advertising and marketing costs, rental fees, personnel costs, capital costs, depreciation of property and equipment, amounts held in or paid from a fidelity fund pursuant to § 4-51-118, and all other operating costs;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, unincorporated association, or other legal entity;

“Prize” means an award, gift, or anything of value regardless of whether there are conditions or restrictions attached to its receipt;

“Share” means any intangible evidence of participation in a lottery game; and

“Ticket” means any tangible evidence issued by the lottery to provide participation in a lottery game.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Hot Trax Champions is not a video lottery as prohibited by Tennessee law, OAG 07-035 (3/23/07), 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35.

4-51-103. Board of directors — Appointment, duties.

The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors composed of seven (7) directors.

The directors shall be residents of this state, shall have expertise in their businesses or professions, and shall be appointed by the governor. All appointments shall be filed with the secretary of state within five (5) working days of appointment.

No person shall serve as a director of the corporation who has been convicted of:

Any felony;

A misdemeanor involving gambling, theft, computer offenses, forgery, perjury, dishonesty or unlawfully selling or providing a product or substance to a minor;

Any violation of this chapter; or

Any offense in a federal court, military court, or court of another state, territory or jurisdiction that under the laws of this state would disqualify such person pursuant to subdivision (c)(1)(A), (c)(1)(B), or (c)(1)(C).

Prior to the appointment of a person as a director, the governor shall submit the names of potential directors to the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the Tennessee bureau of investigation, pursuant to § 38-6-109, shall conduct a criminal history records check on all such persons. The Tennessee bureau of investigation may contract with the federal bureau of investigation, other law enforcement agency or any other legally authorized entity to assist in such investigation. Such persons shall supply a fingerprint sample on request and in the manner requested by the investigating entity. The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall conduct such investigation as soon as practicable after submission of names by the governor. The corporation shall pay, as an operating expense, the cost of the records check. The results of such a records check shall not be considered a record open to the public pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5.

In making the appointments pursuant to subsection (b), the governor shall strive to ensure that the board is composed of directors who are diverse in professional or educational background, ethnicity, race, gender, geographic residency, heritage, perspective and experience.

Directors shall serve terms of five (5) years; provided, however, that of the initial directors appointed:

Two (2) directors shall be appointed for an initial term of one (1) year;

Three (3) directors shall be appointed for an initial term of three (3) years; and

Two (2) directors shall be appointed for an initial term of five (5) years.

After the initial terms, directors shall be appointed to serve five-year terms.

All appointments of the directors shall be confirmed by joint resolution adopted by each house of the general assembly prior to the commencement of the term of office to which such director is appointed. If the general assembly is not in session when initial appointments are made, all initial appointees shall serve the terms prescribed pursuant to subsection (e), unless such appointments are not confirmed within thirty (30) days after the general assembly next convenes following such appointments. Any vacancy on the board shall be filled by the governor to serve the unexpired term and such appointment shall be confirmed in the same manner as the original appointment. However, if the general assembly is not in session and a vacancy occurs, the governor shall fill such vacancy by appointment and the appointee to such vacancy shall serve the unexpired term unless such appointment is not confirmed within thirty (30) days after the general assembly next convenes following the appointment to fill such vacancy.

The term of office of each director shall commence on July 1, following such director's appointment; provided, however, that the term of office for each initial director shall commence on the date of appointment but shall be calculated, for purposes of the term, from July 1, 2003. Notwithstanding this section, at the end of the director's term, the director shall continue to serve until a replacement is appointed by the governor. All initial appointments of directors shall be made on or before July 1, 2003.

A director of the board, or any member of their immediate family, shall not have a direct or indirect interest at the time of their appointment, or within a period of two (2) years prior to their appointment, in any undertaking that puts their personal interest in conflict with that of the corporation, including, but not limited to, any interest, through ownership, stock or otherwise, in a major procurement contract or a participating retailer; provided, however, that a director, or a member of such director's immediate family, may hold an incidental interest not to exceed one percent (1%) of the outstanding stock of a participating retailer.

The directors shall elect from their membership a chair and vice chair. The directors shall also elect a secretary and treasurer who may, from time-to-time, serve as the acting chief executive officer of the corporation. Such officers shall serve for such terms as shall be prescribed by the bylaws of the corporation or until their respective successors are elected and qualified. No director of the board shall hold more than one (1) office of the corporation, except that the same director may serve as secretary and treasurer.

The board of directors may delegate to one (1) or more of its members, to the chief executive officer, or to any agent or employee of the corporation such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

A majority of the directors in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business and for the exercise of any power or function of the corporation.

Action may be taken and motions and resolutions adopted by the board at any board meeting by the affirmative vote of a majority of present and voting directors.

No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of the directors to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the board.

Upon approval by the chair, directors of the board shall be reimbursed for actual and reasonable expenses incurred or a per diem not to exceed the per diem provided to members of the general assembly pursuant to § 3-1-106 for each day's service spent in the performance of the duties of the corporation or both.

Directors shall not receive a salary for their duties.

The governor may remove a director for neglect of duty or misconduct in office.

If the governor seeks removal of a director pursuant to this subsection (o), the governor shall deliver to the director a copy of the charges levied against such director together with a notice of hearing affording such director an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel to defend publicly against such charges prior to removal. The notice of hearing shall be served upon the director no later than ten (10) days prior to the hearing date.

If such director is removed, the governor shall file in the office of the secretary of state a complete statement of all charges made against the director and the governor's findings regarding the charges, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

If a director is removed, such vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as other vacancies on the board.

No director shall make a contribution to the campaign of a candidate for the general assembly or to a candidate for governor.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2019, ch. 507, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-51-104. Chief executive officer — Board duties.

The board of directors shall appoint and shall provide for the compensation of a chief executive officer who shall be an employee of the corporation and who shall direct the day-to-day operations and management of the corporation. The chief executive officer shall be vested with such powers and duties as specified by the board and by law. The chief executive officer shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

The board of directors shall provide the chief executive officer with private sector perspectives of a large marketing enterprise.

The board of directors shall:

Approve, disapprove, amend, or modify the budget recommended by the chief executive officer for the operation of the corporation;

Approve, disapprove, amend, or modify the terms of major lottery procurements recommended by the chief executive officer;

Hear appeals required by this chapter;

Not approve a bonus for, and no bonus shall be paid to, the chief executive officer or any other of the executive employees of the corporation for any fiscal year in which lottery revenues are flat or declining as measured against the previous fiscal year's revenues;

Adopt regulations, policies, and procedures relating to the conduct of lottery games and as specified in § 4-51-108; and

Perform such other functions as specified by this chapter.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2009, ch. 531, § 62.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee education lottery corporation: contract amendments. OAG 10-73, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (5/21/10).

4-51-105. Corporate powers.

The corporation shall have any and all powers necessary or convenient to its usefulness in carrying out and effectuating the purposes and provisions of this chapter that are not in conflict with the constitution of the state of Tennessee and that are generally exercised by corporations engaged in entrepreneurial pursuits, including, but not limited to, the following powers:

To sue and be sued as provided in this chapter;

To adopt and alter a seal;

To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws, regulations, and policies and procedures for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business; to elect and prescribe the duties of officers and employees of the corporation; and to perform such other matters as the corporation may determine. In the adoption of bylaws, regulations, policies, and procedures or in the exercise of any regulatory power, the corporation shall be exempt from the requirements of the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title;

To procure or to provide insurance;

To hold copyrights, trademarks, and service marks and enforce its rights with respect to the copyrights and marks;

To initiate, supervise, and administer the operation of the lottery in accordance with this chapter and regulations, policies, and procedures adopted pursuant to this chapter;

To enter into written agreements with one (1) or more other states or sovereigns for the operation, participation in marketing, and promotion of a joint lottery or joint lottery games;

To conduct such market research as is necessary or appropriate, which may include an analysis of the demographic characteristics of the players of each lottery game and an analysis of advertising, promotion, public relations, incentives, and other aspects of communication;

To acquire or lease real property and make improvements to that real property and acquire by lease or by purchase tangible personal property and intangible personal property;

To enter into contracts to incur debt in its own name and enter into financing agreements with the state, agencies or instrumentalities of the state, or with any commercial bank or credit provider; provided, however, that any such debt must be approved by the state funding board;

To be authorized to administer oaths, take depositions, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence relative to any investigation or proceeding conducted by the corporation;

To appoint and select officers, agents, and employees, including professional and administrative staff and personnel and hearing officers to conduct hearings required by this chapter, and to fix their compensation, pay their expenses, and provide a benefit program, including, but not limited to, a retirement plan and a group insurance plan; provided, however, that the corporation may become a participating employer in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system pursuant to § 4-51-131 and may be eligible as a quasi-governmental organization for state group health insurance pursuant to § 8-27-207 [repealed and reenacted. See Compiler's Notes];

To select and contract with vendors and retailers;

To enter into contracts or agreements with the Tennessee bureau of investigation, local law enforcement agencies, appropriate federal agencies or private companies for the performance of criminal record checks, background investigations, and security checks;

To enter into contracts of any and all types on such terms and conditions as the corporation may determine;

To establish and maintain banking and other financial relationships, including, but not limited to, establishment of checking and savings accounts and lines of credit;

To advertise and promote the lottery and lottery games in a dignified and responsible manner;

To act as a retailer, to conduct promotions that involve the dispensing of lottery tickets or shares, and to establish and operate sales facilities to sell lottery tickets or shares and any related merchandise;

To establish and maintain regional offices; provided, however, that there shall be at least one (1) such office in each grand division; and

To adopt and amend such regulations, policies, and procedures as necessary to carry out and implement its powers and duties, organize and operate the corporation, regulate the conduct of lottery games in general, and any other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and effective operation of the lottery or the convenience of the public. The promulgation of any such regulations, policies, and procedures shall be exempt from the requirements of the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Title 67, chapter 4, parts 7, 20, and 21 shall not apply to the activities of the corporation.

The powers enumerated in subsection (a) are cumulative of and in addition to those powers enumerated elsewhere in this chapter, and do not limit or restrict any other powers of the corporation.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2005, ch. 417, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section8-27-207 referred to in this section was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2015, ch. 426, effective May 18,2015. For current comparable provisions, see now §8-27-702.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-51-106. Investments.

Investment of funds of the corporation shall be undertaken in a manner that first seeks to ensure preservation of principal, that next ensures the liquidity needs of the corporation are met and, after satisfaction of these objectives, seeks a market rate of return.

Pursuant to § 4-51-105(a)(3), the corporation shall adopt an investment policy to govern the investment of assets consistent with the objectives listed in subdivision (a)(1).

A copy of the corporation's investment policy, and any revisions to that policy, shall be filed with the state funding board.

The corporation shall be authorized to invest in securities as provided in § 9-4-602; provided, however, that if the business needs of the corporation necessitate investment in securities or classes of securities not specifically authorized in § 9-4-602, the corporation shall be authorized to invest in such additional securities or classes of securities after filing a statement with the state funding board describing the need for, and nature of, such additional security or classes of securities.

The corporation is authorized, but not required, to invest its moneys as part of the local government investment pool created in title 9, chapter 4, part 7 and shall be deemed to be eligible for participation in such pool.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-107. Bank accounts.

In accordance with § 4-51-105(a)(16), the corporation shall establish and maintain bank accounts only in institutions deemed to be qualified public depositories pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 5; provided, however, that if business needs dictate the establishment of accounts with an institution other than a qualified public depository, the corporation may create such accounts after filing a statement with the state funding board describing the business need for accounts at such an institution and the corporation's plan for securing funds on deposit with such an institution.

For purposes of § 45-2-611, the corporation shall be considered a “governmental entity” and funds in its possession shall be deemed to be “public funds.”

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-108. Adoption of regulations, policies, and procedures.

The board may adopt regulations, policies, and procedures regulating the conduct of lottery games in general including, but not limited to, regulations, policies, and procedures specifying:

The type of games to be conducted, including, but not limited to, instant lotteries, online games, and other games traditional to the lottery. Such games may include the selling of tickets or shares, or the use of electronic or mechanical devices; provided, however, that the board shall not approve, and the corporation shall not operate, a video lottery as defined in § 4-51-102(8)(B);

The sales price of tickets or shares and the manner of sale; provided that all sales shall be for cash only and that payment by checks, credit cards, charge cards or any form of deferred payment is prohibited. For the purposes of this subdivision (a)(2), “cash” means coins or notes. Nothing in this part shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the direct sale of lottery tickets or shares by the corporation through any form of payment and in any amount;

The type, number and amount of prizes;

The method and location of selecting or validating winning tickets or shares;

The manner and time of payment of prizes, which may include lump sum payments or installments over a period of years;

The manner of payment of prizes by the corporation or a lottery retailer to the holders of winning tickets or shares, including, without limitation, provision for payment of prizes not exceeding six hundred dollars ($600) after deducting the price of the ticket or share and after performing validation procedures appropriate to the game and as specified by the board;

The frequency of games and drawings or selection of winning tickets or shares;

The means of conducting drawings;

The method to be used in selling tickets or shares, which may include the use of electronic or mechanical devices, but such devices shall only be placed in locations on the premises of the lottery retailer that are within the view of such retailer or an employee of such retailer and, if outside the area of immediate control of the retailer, such devices shall be equipped with technology allowing such retailer to remotely deactivate such device. All electronic or mechanical devices outside the area of immediate control of the retailer shall bear a conspicuous label at least twelve inches (12") in circumference prohibiting the use of such device by persons under eighteen (18) years of age, stating the following:

ATTENTION: STATE LAW STRICTLY PROHIBITS THE SALE OF LOTTERY TICKETS TO PERSONS UNDER THE AGE OF EIGHTEEN (18) YEARS; PROOF OF AGE MAY BE REQUIRED FOR PURCHASE.

ATENCION: POR LEY DEL ESTADO DE TENNESSEE ES ESTRICTAMENTE PROHIBIDO VENDER BOLETAS DE LOTERIA A PERSONAS MENORES DE DIECIOCHO AQOS; PRUEBA DE EDAD PUEDE SER REQUERIDA PARA COMPRARLAS.

A lottery retailer who allows a person under eighteen (18) years of age to purchase a lottery ticket or share from an electronic or mechanical device shall be subject to the penalties provided in § 39-17-602;

The manner and amount of compensation to lottery retailers; and

Any and all other matters necessary, desirable, or convenient toward ensuring the efficient and effective operation of lottery games, the continued entertainment and convenience of the public, and the integrity of the lottery.

The board may delegate the adoption of regulations, policies, and procedures relating to the conduct of lottery games to the chief executive officer.

The corporation shall not print on any lottery ticket a representation or likeness of the state flag, as provided in § 4-1-301, or the state seal, as provided in § 4-1-314.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

Law Reviews.

So Your Client Just Won the Lottery. ( Dan W. Holbrook), 40 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 32 (2004).

4-51-109. Duties of chief executive officer.

The chief executive officer of the corporation shall direct and supervise all administrative and technical activities in accordance with this chapter and with the regulations, policies, and procedures adopted by the board. It shall be the duty of the chief executive officer to:

Facilitate the initiation and supervise and administer the operation of the lottery games;

Employ and direct such personnel as deemed necessary;

Employ by contract and compensate such persons and firms as deemed necessary;

Promote or provide for promotion of the lottery and any functions related to the corporation;

Prepare a budget for the approval of the board;

Require bond from such retailers and vendors in such amounts as required by the board;

Report quarterly to the comptroller of the treasury, the state treasurer, the state and local government committee of the senate, the state government committee of the house of representatives, the office of legislative budget analysis and the board a full and complete statement of lottery revenues and expenses for the preceding quarter;

Report quarterly to the commissioner of finance and administration, the commissioner of education, the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives, the chair of the education committee of the senate, the chair of the education committee of the house of representatives, and the office of legislative budget analysis, a full and complete statement of the moneys that became unclaimed prize moneys for deposit in the after school programs special account in the preceding quarter; and

Perform other duties generally associated with a chief executive officer of a corporation of an entrepreneurial nature.

The chief executive officer may for good cause suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew any contract entered into in accordance with this chapter or the regulations, policies, and procedures of the board.

The chief executive officer or a designee may conduct hearings and administer oaths to persons for the purpose of assuring the security or integrity of lottery operations or to determine the qualifications of or compliance by vendors and retailers.

No person shall serve as chief executive officer of the corporation who has been convicted of:

Any felony;

A misdemeanor involving gambling, theft, computer offenses, forgery, perjury, dishonesty or unlawfully selling or providing a product or substance to a minor;

Any violation of this chapter; or

Any offense in a federal court, military court or court of another state, territory or jurisdiction that under the laws of this state would disqualify such person pursuant to subdivisions (d)(1)(A), (d)(1)(B), or (d)(1)(C).

Prior to employment of a person as the chief executive officer, the board shall submit the names of potential chief executive officers to the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the Tennessee bureau of investigation, pursuant to § 38-6-109, shall conduct a criminal history records check on all such persons. The Tennessee bureau of investigation may contract with the federal bureau of investigation, other law enforcement agency or any other legally authorized entity to assist in such investigation. Such persons shall supply a fingerprint sample on request and in the manner requested by the investigating entity. The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall conduct such investigation as soon as practicable after submission of names by the board. The corporation shall pay, as an operating expense, the cost of the records check. The results of such a records check shall not be considered a record open to the public pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5.

No person shall be selected to serve as the initial chief executive officer of the corporation who does not possess:

At least two (2) years of experience as a chief executive officer or chief operating officer of a state lottery within the United States; or

At least five (5) years of management level experience with a state lottery within the United States.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2008, ch. 889, § 1; 2010, ch. 1030, §§ 5, 6; 2011, ch. 410, § 9(a); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2015, ch. 182, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-51-110. Employees — Personnel program.

The corporation shall establish and maintain a personnel program for its employees and fix the compensation and terms of compensation of its employees, including, but not limited to, production incentive payments.

No employee of the corporation shall have a financial interest in any vendor doing business or proposing to do business with the corporation.

No employee of the corporation, with decision-making authority, shall participate in any decision involving a retailer with whom the employee has a financial interest.

No employee of the corporation who leaves the employment of the corporation may represent any vendor or lottery retailer before the corporation for a period of two (2) years following termination of employment with the corporation.

All offers of employment shall be extended contingent upon the results of a criminal history records check. Immediately upon the acceptance of the offer of employment, the chief executive officer, or such officer's designee, shall submit the names of such persons to the Tennessee bureau of investigation. The Tennessee bureau of investigation, pursuant to § 38-6-109, shall conduct a criminal history records check on all such persons. The Tennessee bureau of investigation may contract with the federal bureau of investigation, other law enforcement agencies, or any other legally authorized entity to assist in such investigation. Such persons shall supply a fingerprint sample on request, in the manner requested by the investigating entity. The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall conduct such investigation as soon as practicable after submission of names by the chief executive officer or such officer's designee. The corporation shall pay, as an operating expense, the cost of the records check. The results of such a records check shall not be considered a record open to the public, pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5.

In addition to any records check pursuant to subsection (e), those persons accepting an offer of employment with the corporation at the level of division director and above, and at any level within the division of security and as otherwise required by the board, shall immediately have their names submitted by the chief executive officer, or such officer's designee, for a background investigation, which may be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or other law enforcement agency, or any other legally authorized investigative entity. Such investigation shall be conducted as soon as practicable after submission of names by the chief executive officer or such officer's designee. The corporation shall pay, as an operating expense, the cost of the investigation. The results of such investigation shall not be considered a record open to the public, pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5. Such person's offer of employment shall be further contingent upon the results of such investigation.

No person shall be maintained as an employee of the corporation who has been convicted of:

Any felony;

A misdemeanor involving gambling, theft, computer offenses, forgery, perjury, dishonesty or unlawfully selling or providing a product or substance to a minor;

Any violation of this chapter; or

Any offense in a federal court, military court or court of another state, territory or jurisdiction that, under the laws of this state, would disqualify such person, pursuant to subdivision (g)(1), (g)(2) or (g)(3).

The corporation shall bond corporation employees who have access to corporation funds or lottery revenue, in such an amount as provided by the board, and may bond other employees as deemed necessary.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2005, ch. 417, § 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.